Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-731
Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of this state may:

(1) request a tribunal outside this state to assist in obtaining discovery; and

(2) upon request, compel a person over which it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal outside this state.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 31;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 26.